Ohio, session 136, HB511.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That Section 381.10 of H.B. 96 of the 136th 5
General Assembly be amended to read as follows: 6
Sec. 381.10. 7
8
1 2 3 4 5
A BOR DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION
B General Revenue Fund
C GRF 235321 Operating Expenses $8,750,000 $9,250,000
D GRF 235402 Sea Grants $308,000 $308,000
E GRF 235406 Articulation and Transfer $2,269,500 $2,314,890

H. B. No. 511 Page 2
As Introduced
F GRF 235408 Midwest Higher Education $115,000 $115,000
Compact
G GRF 235413 Computer Science $4,004,863 $4,006,508
H GRF 235414 Grants and Scholarship $922,538 $985,378
Administration
I GRF 235417 Technology Maintenance $4,520,396 $4,528,397
and Operations
J GRF 235425 Ohio Work Ready Grant $10,500,000 $10,500,000
K GRF 235428 Appalachian New Economy $3,955,000 $3,955,000
Workforce Partnership
L GRF 235438 Choose Ohio First $32,000,000 $32,000,000
Scholarship
M GRF 235443 Aspire - State $6,322,267 $0
N GRF 235444 Ohio Technical Centers $22,138,000 $22,138,000
O GRF 235450 Military and Veterans $1,144,000 $1,144,000
Offices
P GRF 235474 Area Health Education $1,899,000 $1,899,000
Centers Program Support
Q GRF 235475 Campus Security Support $4,000,000 $0
Program
R GRF 235476 Campus Student Safety $1,000,000 $1,000,000
Grant Program
$11,000,000 $11,000,000

H. B. No. 511 Page 3
As Introduced
S GRF 235492 Campus Safety and $200,000 $200,000
Training
T GRF 235501 State Share of $2,156,383,406 $2,177,772,240
Instruction
U GRF 235504 War Orphans and Severely $25,000,000 $30,000,000
Disabled Veterans'
Children Scholarships
V GRF 235507 OhioLINK $6,447,000 $6,447,000
W GRF 235508 Air Force Institute of $2,000,000 $2,000,000
Technology
X GRF 235510 Ohio Supercomputer Center $5,086,000 $5,086,000
Y GRF 235511 The Ohio State University $25,504,000 $25,504,000
Extension Service
Z GRF 235514 Central State Supplement $12,768,910 $13,151,977
AA GRF 235515 Case Western Reserve $2,100,000 $2,100,000
University School of
Medicine
AB GRF 235519 Family Practice $3,098,000 $3,098,000
AC GRF 235520 Shawnee State Supplement $12,000,000 $12,000,000
AD GRF 235525 Geriatric Medicine $511,000 $511,000
AE GRF 235526 Primary Care Residencies $1,468,000 $1,468,000
AF GRF 235530 Governor's Merit $47,000,000 $70,000,000

H. B. No. 511 Page 4
As Introduced
Scholarship
AG GRF 235533 Program and Project $9,435,000 $1,050,000
Support
AH GRF 235535 Ohio State Agricultural $37,169,000 $37,169,000
Research
AI GRF 235536 The Ohio State University $9,461,000 $9,461,000
Clinical Teaching
AJ GRF 235537 University of Cincinnati $8,085,000 $8,085,000
Clinical Teaching
AK GRF 235538 University of Toledo $6,065,000 $6,065,000
Clinical Teaching
AL GRF 235539 Wright State University $4,447,000 $4,447,000
Clinical Teaching
AM GRF 235540 Ohio University Clinical $2,849,000 $2,849,000
Teaching
AN GRF 235541 Northeast Ohio Medical $2,930,000 $2,930,000
University Clinical
Teaching
AO GRF 235543 Kent State University $500,000 $500,000
College of Podiatric
Medicine Clinic Subsidy
AP GRF 235546 Central State $5,828,000 $5,828,000
Agricultural Research and
Development

H. B. No. 511 Page 5
As Introduced
AQ GRF 235548 Central State Cooperative $5,168,000 $5,168,000
Extension Services
AR GRF 235552 Capital Component $1,236,561 $1,236,561
AS GRF 235555 Library Depositories $700,000 $500,000
AT GRF 235556 Ohio Academic Resources $3,568,000 $3,568,000
Network
AU GRF 235558 Long-term Care Research $318,000 $318,000
AV GRF 235563 Ohio College Opportunity $220,600,000 $207,400,000
Grant
AW GRF 235569 The Ohio State University $15,000,000 $15,000,000
College of Veterinary
Medicine Supplement
AX GRF 235572 The Ohio State University $750,000 $750,000
Clinic Support
AY GRF 235578 Federal Research Network $5,099,000 $5,099,000
AZ GRF 235585 Educator Preparation $600,000 $600,000
Programs
BA GRF 235591 Co-Op Internship Program $1,065,000 $1,065,000
BB GRF 235595 Commercial Truck Driver $3,000,000 $3,000,000
Student Aid Program
BC GRF 235599 National Guard $18,399,750 $18,399,750
Scholarship Program

H. B. No. 511 Page 6
As Introduced
BD GRF 2355A4 Ohio Higher Education $500,000 $500,000
Public Policy Research
Consortium
BE GRF 235909 Higher Education General $250,000,000 $210,000,000
Obligation Bond Debt
Service
BF General Revenue Fund Total $3,016,188,191 $2,994,470,701
$3,026,188,191 $3,004,470,701
BG Dedicated Purpose Fund Group
BH 2200 235614 Program Approval and $769,126 $789,679
Reauthorization
BI 4560 235603 Sales and Services $129,725 $133,017
BJ 4E80 235602 Higher Educational $69,839 $73,807
Facility Commission
Administration
BK 5AH1 235688 Super RAPIDS $10,000,000 $0
BL 5CJ1 2356A2 Strategic Square Footage $82,650,000 $0
Reduction
BM 5D40 235675 Conference/Special $125,000 $125,000
Purposes
BN 5FR0 235650 State and Non-Federal $1,405,944 $1,412,670
Grants and Awards
BO 5P30 235663 Variable Savings Plan $8,522,034 $8,522,034

H. B. No. 511 Page 7
As Introduced
BP 5YD0 235494 Second Chance Grant $2,000,000 $2,000,000
Program
BQ 5ZD0 235426 Rural Practice Incentive $1,500,000 $1,500,000
Program
BR 5ZY0 235592 Grow Your Own Teacher $2,500,000 $2,500,000
Program
BS 6450 235664 Guaranteed Savings Plan $1,110,131 $1,110,132
BT 6820 235606 Nursing Loan Program $1,203,730 $1,210,344
BU Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $111,985,529 $19,376,683
BV Bond Research and Development Fund Group
BW 7014 235639 Research Incentive Third $8,000,000 $8,000,000
Frontier - Tax
BX Bond Research and Development Fund $8,000,000 $8,000,000
Group Total
BY Federal Fund Group
BZ 3120 235611 Gear-up Grant $2,956,000 $2,956,000
CA 3120 235612 Carl D. Perkins $1,371,939 $1,388,525
Grant/Plan Administration
CB 3120 235641 Aspire - Federal $18,996,799 $0
CC 3120 235669 Industry Credential $300,000 $300,000
Transfer Assurance Guides
Initiative

H. B. No. 511 Page 8
As Introduced
CD 3BG0 235651 Gear Up Grant $3,100,000 $3,100,000
Scholarships
CE 3N60 235658 John R. Justice Student $128,000 $128,000
Loan Repayment Program
CF Federal Fund Group Total $26,852,738 $7,872,525
CG TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $3,163,026,458 $3,029,719,909
$3,173,026,458 $3,039,719,909
Section 2. That existing Section 381.10 of H.B. 96 of the 9
136th General Assembly is hereby repealed. 10